Arkansas, session 2025, SB570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-502(a), concerning the membership of
the Joint Budget Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The Joint Budget Committee shall consist of:
(i) The current cochairs of the Legislative Council;
(ii) The immediate past cochairs of the Legislative
Council;
(iii) The current cochairs of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee;
(iv) The immediate past cochairs of the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee;
(v) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(vi) The immediate past President Pro Tempore of the
Senate;

(vii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
*MBM033*
03/27/2025 5:44:02 PM MBM033

SB570
(viii) The immediate past Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
(v)(ix) Twenty-four (24) members and eight (8)
alternate members of the House of Representatives; and
(vi)(x) Twenty-four (24) members of the Senate.
(B) If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative
Council is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of
the immediate past House cochair.
(C) If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the
Legislative Council is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the
immediate past Senate cochair.
(D) If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the
stead of the immediate past House cochair.
(E) If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the Senate, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to
serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.
(F) If the immediate past President Pro Tempore of the
Senate is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate
past President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(G) If the immediate past Speaker of the House of
Representatives is not a member of the House of Representatives, the Speaker
of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in
the stead of the immediate past Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(F)(H) If the House Cochair of the Legislative Council has
not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a
member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative
Council elect a cochair of the Legislative Council.
(G)(I) If the House Cochair of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House
03/27/2025 5:44:02 PM MBM033

SB570
members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee elect a cochair of the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
(2) The Senate Vice Chair of the Joint Budget Committee shall be
selected in the same manner as the Senate Vice Chair of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee.































03/27/2025 5:44:02 PM MBM033